Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-106] Gifts; investment authority.
(a) The board of regents may receive, manage, and invest moneys or other
property, real, personal, or mixed, which may be given, bequeathed, devised, or
in any manner received from sources other than the legislature or any federal
appropriation for the purpose of the university, its improvement or adornment,
or the aid or advantage of students or faculty, and in general act as trustee
on behalf of the university for any of such purposes or objects.

(b) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding,
land-grant college aid moneys obtained under section [304A-2401] may be
received, managed, and invested pursuant to this section.

(c) The board of regents shall cause to be
kept suitable books of account wherein shall be recorded each gift, the
essential facts of the management thereof, and the expenditure of the income.
A statement of all trust funds shall be included in the annual report to the
governor and the legislature. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next